District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.03c

Public Accessible Rent Control Housing Clearinghouse.

(a)

The Rental Accommodations Division (“RAD”) of the Department of Housing and Community Development (“DHCD”), in close consultation with the Office of the Tenant Advocate and the Office of the Chief Technology Officer, is authorized to establish a user-friendly, internet-accessible, searchable database for the submission, management, and review of all documents and relevant data that this subchapter requires housing providers to submit to the RAD.

(b)

The database shall:

(1)

Include an online portal, not accessible to the general public, for the filing of all documents and data by housing providers as required by this subchapter, and all regulations promulgated pursuant to this subchapter; and

(2)

Include an online portal accessible to the general public that provides information drawn from the documents submitted by housing providers pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, relevant to tenants seeking and living in rent control accommodations.

(c)

The portal accessible to the general public shall include at a minimum, the following real-time, searchable parameters:

(1)

The building address and ward number;

(2)

The base rent for each rental unit in the accommodation;

(3)

Any services or facilities provided as part of the base rent;

(4)

The amount and date of each annual rent increase or decrease;

(5)

The number of bedrooms in each unit;

(6)

The vacancy status of each unit;

(7)

The accessibility information of the building, as it relates to District of Columbia and federal law;

(8)

The name, telephone number, and email address of the housing provider and property manager;

(9)

Dates and numbers of the basic business license of the housing provider;

(10)

Dates and numbers of the certificate of occupancy of the building;

(11)

The name, contact information, and place of business of the registered agent of the building, if applicable;

(12)

The licensing and registration of the property manager of the accommodation, when other than the housing provider;

(13)

The RAD registration exemption number and date of the housing accommodation;

(14)

Any pro-active inspection dates;

(15)

Any outstanding violations of the housing regulations applicable to the accommodation;

(16)

The notice date of any housing code violations;

(17)

The rate of return for the housing accommodation and computation required by § 42-3502.05(f)(6);

(18)

Any petitions filed by the housing provider including, related services and facilities petition, capital improvement petition, substantial rehabilitation petition, voluntary agreement petition, hardship petition, other valid tenant petitions;

(19)

Any court or administrative actions; and

(20)

Other information the RAD determines is relevant to tenants seeking and living in rent control accommodations.

(d)

The portal accessible to the general public shall exclude any documentation submitted in support of a tenant’s application for elderly or disability status pursuant to § 42-3502.08(h)(2), and any other information the Rent Administrator may deem necessary to exclude to protect the privacy and personal information of a tenant.

(e)

The database should be completed in phases according to the following timeline:

(1)

Phase 1 — Within 6 months of October 22, 2015, DHCD should award a contract to build the database.

(2)

Phase 2 — Within one year of October 22, 2015, DHCD should ensure that the database portals are operational for the entry of data by housing providers, and for the general public to conduct searches of the information in the database.

(3)

Phase 3 — Within 2 years of October 22, 2015, DHCD should ensure the integration of existing data contained in documents previously submitted to the RAD, pursuant to this subchapter, into the database.

(f)

Beginning with the completion of Phase 2, all documents required to be filed by this subchapter, should be submitted to the RAD through the online database.

(g)

Beginning 6 months after October 22, 2015, and continuing every 6 months thereafter until phase 3 of database is completed, the RAD should report to the Council on the progress of the establishment of the database.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 203a
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2212(a), 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2122(a) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).